Massachusetts, session 194th, H750.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 69 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting the following new section:-
SECTION 1B. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
department of elementary and secondary education, based on available appropriations, will
establish a CPR in Schools Fund to provide financial incentives for school districts that require
psychomotor skill-based CPR and AED training prior to graduation.
SECTION 2 Psychomotor Skill-Based hands only CPR Training shall be based on
national Guidelines for CPR and ECC which incorporates the use of hands-on practicing.
SECTION 3 These incentives may be in the form of mini-grants or subsidies to support
equipment, professional development for psychomotor skills-based CPR training for students to
provide hands only CPR training and use of an automated external defibrillator. There shall be a
priority for school districts that are considered high needs as defined as; where at least 50% of
of 2

children are eligible to receive free and reduced priced meals or a school participates in the
Community Eligibility Provision or Universal Free Meals or high-need schools may also be
defined by Title 1 status.
of 2